Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.643

Biodiesel fuel blends—Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 43.19.642 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Biodiesel" means a mono alkyl ester of long chain fatty acids derived from vegetable oils or animal fats for use in compression-ignition engines and that meets the requirements of the American society of testing and materials specification D 6751 in effect as of January 1, 2003.

(2) "Ultra-low sulfur diesel" means petroleum diesel in which the sulfur content is not more than thirty parts per million.

[ 2003 c 17 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—2003 c 17: See note following RCW 43.19.642.